Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disclosure of potential conflicts. (a) A public official or a local official elected to or appointed by a new text begin political subdivision or a new text end metropolitan governmental unit who in the discharge of official duties would be required to take an action or make a decision that would substantially affect the official's financial interests or those of an associated business, unless the effect on the official is no greater than on other members of the official's business classification, profession, or occupation, must take the following actions: (1) prepare a written statement describing the matter requiring action or decision and the nature of the potential conflict of interest; (2) deliver copies of the statement to the official's immediate superior, if any; and (3) if a member of the legislature deleted text begin or of thedeleted text end new text begin , anew text end governing body of a metropolitan governmental unit, new text begin or a political subdivision, new text end deliver a copy of the statement to the presiding officer of the body of service. If a potential conflict of interest presents itself and there is insufficient time to comply with clauses (1) to (3), the public or local official must orally inform the superior or the official body of service or committee of the body of the potential conflict. (b) For purposes of this section, "financial interest" means any ownership or control in an asset that has the potential to produce a monetary return. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Required actions. (a) If the official is not a member of the legislature or of the governing body of a metropolitan governmental unitnew text begin or of a political subdivisionnew text end , the superior must assign the matter, if possible, to another employee who does not have a potential conflict of interest. (b) If there is no immediate superior, the official must abstain, if possible, by assigning the matter to a subordinate for disposition or requesting the appointing authority to designate another to determine the matter. The official shall not chair a meeting, participate in any vote, or offer any motion or discussion on the matter giving rise to the potential conflict of interest. (c) If the official is a member of the legislature, the house of service may, at the member's request, excuse the member from taking part in the action or decision in question. (d) If an official is not permitted or is otherwise unable to abstain from action in connection with the matter, the official must file a statement describing the potential conflict and the action taken. A public official must file the statement with the board and a local official must file the statement with the governing body of the official's political subdivision. The statement must be filed within a week of the action taken. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.08, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disclosure required. (a) A public official new text begin or elected local official new text end who represents a client for a fee before an individual, board, commission, or agency that has rulemaking authority in a hearing conducted under chapter 14, must disclose the official's participation in the action to the board within 14 days after the public official's initial appearance at a hearing. If the public official fails to disclose the participation by the date that the disclosure was due, the board may impose a late filing fee of $25 per day, not to exceed $1,000, starting on the day after the disclosure was due. The board must send notice by certified mail to a public official who fails to disclose the participation within ten business days after the disclosure was due that the public official may be subject to a civil penalty for failure to disclose the participation. A public official who fails to disclose the participation within seven days after the certified mail notice was sent by the board is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of up to $1,000. (b) A public official new text begin or elected local official new text end required to disclose representation under this section shall provide the following information: name, address, and office held; name and address of each client represented at the hearing; the name of the individual, board, commission, or agency conducting the hearing and the date and location of the initial appearance at the hearing; and a general description of the subject or subjects on which the public official represented the client in the hearing. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 10A.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Time for filing. An individual must file a statement of economic interest: (1) within 60 days of accepting employment as a public official or a local official in a new text begin political subdivision or a new text end metropolitan governmental unit; (2) within 60 days of assuming office as a district court judge, appeals court judge, new text begin or new text end supreme court justicedeleted text begin , or county commissionerdeleted text end ; (3) within 14 days after the end of the filing period for a candidate who filed an affidavit of candidacy or petition to appear on the ballot for an elective state constitutional or legislative office or an elective local office new text begin in a political subdivision or new text end in a metropolitan governmental unit deleted text begin other than county commissionerdeleted text end ; (4) in the case of a public official requiring the advice and consent of the senate, within 14 days after undertaking the duties of office; or (5) in the case of members of the Minnesota Racing Commission, the director of the Minnesota Racing Commission, chief of security, medical officer, inspector of pari-mutuels, and stewards employed or approved by the commission or persons who fulfill those duties under contract, within 60 days of accepting or assuming duties. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.09, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Original statement; reporting period. (a) An original statement of economic interest required under subdivision 1, clause (1), must cover the calendar month before the month in which the individual accepted employment as a public official or a local official in a new text begin political subdivision or a new text end metropolitan governmental unit. (b) An original statement of economic interest required under subdivision 1, clauses (2), (4), and (5), must cover the calendar month before the month in which the individual assumed or undertook the duties of office. (c) An original statement of economic interest required under subdivision 1, clause (3), must cover the calendar month before the month in which the candidate filed the affidavit of candidacy. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.09, subdivision 6a, is amended to read: Subd. 6a. Place of filing. A public official required to file a statement under this section must file it with the board. A new text begin local candidate or new text end local official required to file a statement under this section must file it with the governing body of the official's political subdivision. The governing body must maintain statements filed with it under this subdivision as public data. If an official position is defined as both a public official and as a local official deleted text begin of a metropolitan governmental unitdeleted text end under this chapter, the official must file the statement with the board. Sec. 7. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective January 1, 2027. new text end